algorithms/ukrainian.sbl
                '{b}{i}{k}'       (atlimit <- '{b}{o}{k}')      // бік
                '{k}{i}{t}'       (atlimit <- '{k}{o}{t}')      // кіт
                '{r}{i}{h}'       (atlimit <- '{r}{o}{h}')      // ріг
                '{s}{i}{k}'       (atlimit <- '{s}{o}{k}')      // сік
            )
        ) )
        // Guards for the verb endings -ла/-ли/-ло and -ти, tested on the
        // whole word (after an optional -ся/-сь) so that the letter before
        // the ending is seen in 5-letter words too, where it sits outside
        // pV (школа → школ, число → числ, карти → карт, факти → факт).
        //
        // -ла/-ли/-ло is not a past tense after о (Микола, школа, апостоли,
        // навколо: nouns far outnumber verbs like виборола), after л, т, д,
        // в, й, б, п (Абдулла, світло, сідло, Павло, Михайло, срібло,
        // тепло: the verbs with these before the ending are rare, пливла,
        // ослабла), after р (Карла, гирло, горло: the frequent verbs
        // померла, вимерли are listed as exceptions), or after е unless
        // -вело (весело, ремесло are not verbs; призвело, привело are).
        // -ороли/-орола are the one verb family behind о (бороли,
        // виборола), so о only guards when not preceded by р;
        // стала/стали/стало are the past of стати, so т does not guard
        // the bare с.
        //
        // -ти is not an infinitive after н, е, о, іс, ис (документи,
        // портрети, роботи, спеціалісти, листи), nor after к, р, ш, ф, х,
        // п, б, в, л, м, т, ь, ю, є (пункти, карти, кошти, нафти, шахти,
        // рецепти, хребти, астронавти, Ялти, Мальти, валюти, дієти): the
        // infinitives in -кти and -рти (втекти, померти) are listed as
        // exceptions, the rest are rare (текти, стерти, гребти, пливти).
        unset found_la_noun
        unset found_ty_noun
        do ( backwards (
            // the same reflexive endings as the reflexive rule removes
            try ( among ( '{t}{y}{s}{ia}' '{t}{y}{s}{'}' '{l}{a}{s}{'}'
                          '{v}{s}{ia}' '{v}{s}{'}' '{s}{ia}' '{s}{'}' ) )
            ( ( ( '{l}{a}' or '{l}{y}' or '{l}{o}' )
                ( ( '{o}' not '{r}' ) or '{l}' or ( '{t}' not ( '{s}' atlimit ) )
                  or '{d}' or '{v}' or '{i`}' or '{b}' or '{p}' or '{r}'
                  or ( '{e}' not '{v}' ) )
                set found_la_noun )
              or
              ( '{t}{y}'
                ( '{n}' or '{e}' or '{o}' or '{i}{s}' or '{y}{s}'
                  or '{k}' or '{r}' or '{sh}' or '{f}' or '{kh}' or '{p}' or '{b}'
                  or '{v}' or '{l}' or '{m}' or '{t}' or '{'}' or '{iu}' or '{ie}' )
                set found_ty_noun ) )
        ) )
        unset found_diminutive
        unset found_professional
        unset found_ia
        unset found_verb
        mark_regions // signals 'f' if input < 3 characters
        backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
            do (
                 perfective_gerund or
                 ( reflexive_full set found_verb ) or
                 ( try ( reflexive set found_verb )
                   ( verbal_noun or
                     // do(): after a replacement (-ок <- к) the cursor sits
                     // left of the new text; do() puts it back at the end so
                     // the rules below see the whole word (залишок → залишк)
                     ( do ( ( professional (set found_professional) )
                            or ( diminutive (set found_diminutive) ) )
                       // found_verb: a verb stem may end in -іш (вирішити →
                       // виріш); comparative must leave it alone
                       not found_professional ( adjective or (verb set found_verb) or noun )
                     )
                   )
                 )
            )
            // Diminutive stems (after adjective endings removed)
            try ( diminutive_stem (set found_diminutive) )

            // Professional suffixes (after noun declension removed)
            // Skip if diminutive already fired (prevents -ач removal on собач- from собаченітко)
            // Inside do(): a failing 'not' must not abort the steps below
            // (found_professional words still need derivational and tidy_up:
            // командувач → командув → команд, будильник → будил)
            do ( not found_diminutive not found_professional not found_ia professional )

            do ( not found_verb comparative )

            // Derivational suffixes (in R2 only)
            do derivational
            do tidy_up
        )
    )
)
